Utah statutes.
58-28-305.   Term of license -- Expiration -- Renewal.

(1)  A license as a veterinarian issued under this chapter shall be issued in accordance with a two-year renewal cycle established by rule.  A renewal period may be extended or shortened by as much as one year to maintain established renewal cycles or to change an established renewal cycle.

(2)  A license as a veterinarian intern issued under this chapter shall be issued for a term established by the division by rule and consistent with the requirements of Subsection 58-28-302(2)(b).

(3)  Each license under this chapter automatically expires on the expiration date shown on the license unless renewed by the licensee in accordance with Section 58-1-308.

